Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-403
Complaint; person cited; failure to comply; penalty.

If the person cited under section 30-402 refuses (1) to appear and submit to such examination, (2) to answer such interrogatories as may be put to him or her touching the matter of such complaint, or (3) to bring with him or her any of the documents or writings set forth in the citation which may be in his or her possession or control, the court may, by warrant, commit such person to the county jail of the county to remain in custody until he or she submits to the order of the court. All such interrogatories and answers shall be in writing, shall be signed by the party examined, and shall be filed in the county court.

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 25;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 30-3003;

Laws 2015, LB43, § 5.